Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, HB2284.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Appropriation; department of transportation; road improvements; Piñon unified school district The sum of $3,700,000 is appropriated from the state general fund in fiscal year 2026-2027 to the department of transportation to distribute to the Navajo division of transportation for road improvements for the Piñon unified school district.